Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5206
Board; officers; expenses.

Once every two years, the members of the board shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. A member of the board may be reelected to the position of chairperson or vice-chairperson upon the discretion of the board. Members of the board shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 86.